Wisconsin, session 2025, AB351.
do enact as follows:AB351,11Section 1. 632.872 of the statutes is created to read:AB351,2,32632.872 Restrictions relating to virtual credit card payments for 3disability insurance policies. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB351,2,44(a) “Disability insurance policy” has the meaning given in s. 632.895 (1) (a).AB351,2,55(b) “Health care provider” has the meaning given in s. 146.81 (1). AB351,2,136(c) “Virtual credit card payment” means an electronic funds transfer in which 7an insurer, or a contracted vendor, issues a single-use series of numbers associated 8with payment for services performed by a health care provider and chargeable to a 9predetermined dollar amount, in which the health care provider is responsible for 10processing the payment through a credit card terminal or internet portal, and in 11which the single-use series of numbers expires upon payment processing. “Virtual 12credit card payment” does not include a payment in which a physical credit card is 13used.AB351,2,1614(2) Method of payment. (a) An insurer offering a disability insurance policy 15may not require a health care provider to accept payments under the disability 16insurance policy by virtual credit card payment.AB351,2,2017(b) Beginning on the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], an 18insurer offering a disability insurance policy shall do all of the following before the 19first time the insurer provides a payment to a health care provider under the 20disability insurance policy via a virtual credit card payment:AB351,2,22211. Notify the health care provider of any fees associated with each payment 22method option available.AB351,3,2232. Inform the health care provider of the payment method options available 1and provide clear instructions to the health care provider for selecting a payment 2method other than virtual credit card payment.AB351,3,73(c) An insurer, or a contracted vendor, that transmits a payment to a health 4care provider under a disability insurance policy in accordance with the standards 5under 45 CFR 162.1602 may not charge a fee solely for the transmission of the 6payment to the health care provider unless the health care provider has consented 7to payment of the fee.AB351,3,98(3) Waiver prohibited. The requirements under sub. (2) may not be waived. 9Any provision of a contract contrary to sub. (2) is void and unenforceable.AB351,210Section 2. Initial applicability.AB351,3,1211(1) The treatment of s. 632.872 (3) first applies to a contract that is entered 12into, renewed, or modified on the effective date of this subsection.AB351,3,1313